Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.155

Examining board—Notice of disciplinary action.

The board shall report to appropriate national and state organizations which represent the profession of psychology any disciplinary action.

[ 1994 c 35 s 5; 1987 c 150 s 54; 1984 c 279 s 89.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.